Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB379.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 186.763 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in subsection (2) of this section, a person may operate a
fully autonomous vehicle on the highways of this state without a human driver
provided that the automated driving system is engaged and the vehicle meets the
following conditions:
(a) If a failure of the automated driving system occurs that renders that system
unable to perform the entire dynamic driving task relevant to its intended
operational design domain, the fully autonomous vehicle will achieve a
minimal risk condition;
(b) The fully autonomous vehicle is capable of operating in compliance with the
applicable traffic and motor vehicle safety laws and regulations of this state
when reasonable to do so, unless an exemption has been granted by the
Transportation Cabinet; and
(c) When required by federal law, the vehicle bears the required manufacturer's
certification label indicating that at the time of its manufacture it has been
certified to be in compliance with all applicable federal motor vehicle safety
standards, including any exemptions granted by the National Highway Traffic
Safety Administration.
(2) From July 15, 2024, until July 31, 2026, a fully autonomous vehicle for which the
declared gross weight of the vehicle and any towed unit is more than sixty-two
thousand (62,000) pounds shall have a human driver, with the appropriate
credentials to operate the vehicle, present in the vehicle to monitor the performance
of the vehicle and intervene if necessary.
(3) Prior to operating a fully autonomous vehicle on the highways of this state without
a human driver, a person shall submit a law enforcement interaction plan to the
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 9/26/2024 10:51 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 89
Transportation Cabinet and the Department of Kentucky State Police that describes:
(a) How to communicate with a fleet support specialist who is available during
the times the vehicle is in operation;
(b) How to safely remove the fully autonomous vehicle from the roadway and
steps to safely tow the vehicle;
(c) How to recognize whether the automated driving system is engaged on the
fully autonomous vehicle; and
(d) Any additional information the manufacturer or owner deems necessary
regarding hazardous conditions or public safety risks associated with the
operation of the fully autonomous vehicle.
(4) A school district shall not operate a fully autonomous vehicle as a school bus, as
defined in KRS 156.153, or use any fully autonomous vehicle to transport
students for any purpose.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 9/26/2024 10:51 AM Jacketed